apertium-id-ms.ms.lexc
! apertium-id-ms.ms.lexc

Multichar_Symbols

! Part-of-Speech
%<n%>           ! Noun
%<vblex%>       ! Standard verb
%<vbhaver%>     ! Verb 'to have'
%<adj%>         ! Adjective
%<adv%>         ! Adverb
%<prn%>         ! Pronoun
%<num%>         ! Numeral
%<np%>          ! Proper noun
%<pr%>          ! Preposition
%<cnjcoo%>      ! Co-ordinating conjunction
%<cnjsub%>      ! Sub-ordinating conjunction
%<part%>        ! Particle
%<mod%>         ! Modal
%<det%>         ! Determiner

! Person
%<p1%> ! First person
%<p2%> ! Second person
%<p3%> ! Third person

! Number
%<sg%> ! Singular
%<pl%> ! Plural

! Numeral
%<card%> ! Cardinal
%<ord%>  ! Ordinal

! Voice Type
%<actv%> ! Active
%<pasv%> ! Passive

! Transitivity Mark
%<appl%> ! Applicative
%<caus%> ! Causative

! Question
%<qst%> ! Question

! Awalan
%<men%>
%<di%>
%<ber%>
%<per%>
%<ter%>
%<ke%>
%<se%>

! Akhiran
%<an%>
%<i%>
%<kan%>
%<nya%>

! Reduplikasi
%<redup%>

! Flag diacritics
@P.PREF.meN@ @R.PREF.meN@
@P.PREF.di@ @R.PREF.di@
@P.PREF.ber@ @R.PREF.ber@
@P.PREF.per@ @R.PREF.per@
@P.PREF.ter@ @R.PREF.ter@
@P.PREF.peN@ @R.PREF.peN@
@P.PREF.ke@ @R.PREF.ke@
@P.PREF.se@ @R.PREF.se@
@P.PREF.Redup@ @R.PREF.Redup@
@D.PREF@

! Morphophoneme
%{N%} ! underspecified nasal
%{H%} ! reduplication hyphen


LEXICON Root

Prefixes ;

ProperNouns ;
Conjunctions ;
Questions ;
Prepositions ;
Pronouns ;
Particles ;


LEXICON Prefixes

Stems ;
PrefixMeN ;
PrefixDi ;
PrefixBer ;
PrefixPer ;
PrefixTer ;
PrefixKe ;
PrefixSe ;


LEXICON Stems

Nouns ;
Verbs ;
Adjectives ;
Adverbs ;
Numerals ;


LEXICON PrefixMeN

< [ 0 .x. m e "{N}" ] "@P.PREF.meN@" > Stems ;


LEXICON PrefixDi

< [ 0 .x. d i ] "@P.PREF.di@" > Stems ;


LEXICON PrefixBer

< [ 0 .x. b e r ] "@P.PREF.ber@" > Stems ;


LEXICON PrefixPer

< [ 0 .x. p e r ] "@P.PREF.per@" > Stems ;


LEXICON PrefixTer

< [ 0 .x. t e r ] "@P.PREF.ter@" > Stems ;


LEXICON PrefixKe

< [ 0 .x. k e ] "@P.PREF.ke@" > Stems ;


LEXICON PrefixSe

< [ 0 .x. s e ] "@P.PREF.se@" > Stems ;


LEXICON Nouns

adik Noun-Sg ;
air Noun-Sg ;
anak Noun-Sg ;
anjing Noun-Sg ;
apapun Noun-Sg ;
bawah Noun-Sg ;
belakang Noun-Sg ;
buah Noun-Sg ;
bunyi Noun-Sg ;
burung Noun-Sg ;
cuaca Noun-Sg ;
dalam Noun-Sg ;
depan Noun-Sg ;
ekor Noun-Sg ;
haiwan Noun-Sg ;
hari Noun-Sg ;
ibu Noun-Sg ;
jawab Noun-Sg ;
jawapan Noun-Sg ;
jendela Noun-Sg ;
kata Noun-Sg ;
kebun Noun-Sg ;
kelmarin Noun-Sg ;
kepala Noun-Sg ;
kucing Noun-Sg ;
kursi Noun-Sg ;
luar Noun-Sg ;
manusia Noun-Sg ;
mata Noun-Sg ;
meja Noun-Sg ;
milik Noun-Sg ;
orang Noun-Sg ;
pohon Noun-Sg ;
putera Noun-Sg ;
puteri Noun-Sg ;
rumah Noun-Sg ;
saksi Noun-Sg ;
sekarang Noun-Sg ;
sekitaran Noun-Sg ;
seorang Noun-Sg ;
tahun Noun-Sg ;
taman Noun-Sg ;
tangan Noun-Sg ;
tawa Noun-Sg ;
tingkap Noun-Sg ;
ujar Noun-Sg ;
umur Noun-Sg ;
usia Noun-Sg ;
waktu Noun-Sg ;

main Noun-Sg-Per-An ;

buah Noun-Sg-Se ;
ekor Noun-Sg-Se ;


LEXICON Verbs

ada Verb ;
adalah Verb ;
balas Verb ;
bicara Verb ;
bisa Verb ;
boleh Verb ;
cakap Verb ;
cari Verb ;
cuba Verb ;
dapat Verb ;
datang Verb ;
dengar Verb ;
duduk Verb ;
fikir Verb ;
gesa Verb ;
hitung Verb ;
ialah Verb ;
jadi Verb ;
jalan Verb ;
laku Verb ;
lalu Verb ;
lari Verb ;
lewat Verb ;
lihat Verb ;
main Verb ;
makan Verb ;
masuk Verb ;
mempunyai Verb ;
minum Verb ;
pergi Verb ;
punya Verb ;
selesai Verb ;
sembunyi Verb ;
suka Verb ;
tahu Verb ;
tanya Verb ;
temu Verb ;
tergesa%-gesa Verb ;
toleh Verb ;
tutup Verb ;

baik Verb-MeN ;
balas Verb-MeN ;
besar Verb-MeN ;
cari Verb-MeN ;
cuba Verb-MeN ;
dapat Verb-MeN ;
dekat Verb-MeN ;
dengar Verb-MeN ;
ekor Verb-MeN ;
hangat Verb-MeN ;
hitung Verb-MeN ;
jadi Verb-MeN ;
jawab Verb-MeN ;
kecil Verb-MeN ;
lihat Verb-MeN ;
makan Verb-MeN ;
minum Verb-MeN ;
putih Verb-MeN ;
tahun Verb-MeN ;
toleh Verb-MeN ;
tua Verb-MeN ;
tutup Verb-MeN ;

laku Verb-Di-Kan ;

air Verb-MeN-I ;
bawah Verb-MeN-I ;
belakang Verb-MeN-I ;
buah Verb-MeN-I ;
cermat Verb-MeN-I ;
cuba Verb-MeN-I ;
cukup Verb-MeN-I ;
dalam Verb-MeN-I ;
dapat Verb-MeN-I ;
datang Verb-MeN-I ;
dekat Verb-MeN-I ;
duduk Verb-MeN-I ;
hangat Verb-MeN-I ;
hitung Verb-MeN-I ;
ingin Verb-MeN-I ;
jalan Verb-MeN-I ;
kepala Verb-MeN-I ;
lalu Verb-MeN-I ;
lebih Verb-MeN-I ;
lewat Verb-MeN-I ;
makan Verb-MeN-I ;
masuk Verb-MeN-I ;
milik Verb-MeN-I ;
minum Verb-MeN-I ;
suka Verb-MeN-I ;
tangan Verb-MeN-I ;
tanya Verb-MeN-I ;
temu Verb-MeN-I ;
tidur Verb-MeN-I ;
tutup Verb-MeN-I ;

ada Verb-MeN-Kan ;
bahagia Verb-MeN-Kan ;
baik Verb-MeN-Kan ;
balas Verb-MeN-Kan ;
bawah Verb-MeN-Kan ;
belakang Verb-MeN-Kan ;
besar Verb-MeN-Kan ;
bicara Verb-MeN-Kan ;
buah Verb-MeN-Kan ;
bunyi Verb-MeN-Kan ;
cari Verb-MeN-Kan ;
cermat Verb-MeN-Kan ;
cuba Verb-MeN-Kan ;
cukup Verb-MeN-Kan ;
dalam Verb-MeN-Kan ;
dapat Verb-MeN-Kan ;
datang Verb-MeN-Kan ;
dekat Verb-MeN-Kan ;
dengar Verb-MeN-Kan ;
duduk Verb-MeN-Kan ;
fikir Verb-MeN-Kan ;
hangat Verb-MeN-Kan ;
hitung Verb-MeN-Kan ;
indah Verb-MeN-Kan ;
ingin Verb-MeN-Kan ;
jadi Verb-MeN-Kan ;
jalan Verb-MeN-Kan ;
jawab Verb-MeN-Kan ;
jelas Verb-MeN-Kan ;
kecil Verb-MeN-Kan ;
lain Verb-MeN-Kan ;
laku Verb-MeN-Kan ;
lalu Verb-MeN-Kan ;
lari Verb-MeN-Kan ;
lebih Verb-MeN-Kan ;
lewat Verb-MeN-Kan ;
lihat Verb-MeN-Kan ;
main Verb-MeN-Kan ;
makan Verb-MeN-Kan ;
masuk Verb-MeN-Kan ;
pasti Verb-MeN-Kan ;
punya Verb-MeN-Kan ;
putih Verb-MeN-Kan ;
rumah Verb-MeN-Kan ;
saksi Verb-MeN-Kan ;
sama Verb-MeN-Kan ;
selesai Verb-MeN-Kan ;
sembunyi Verb-MeN-Kan ;
seronok Verb-MeN-Kan ;
suka Verb-MeN-Kan ;
tanya Verb-MeN-Kan ;
temu Verb-MeN-Kan ;
tentu Verb-MeN-Kan ;
tidur Verb-MeN-Kan ;
toleh Verb-MeN-Kan ;
tua Verb-MeN-Kan ;
tutup Verb-MeN-Kan ;
ujar Verb-MeN-Kan ;

ada Verb-Ber ;
bahagia Verb-Ber ;
bicara Verb-Ber ;
cakap Verb-Ber ;
fikir Verb-Ber ;
hitung Verb-Ber ;
jalan Verb-Ber ;
jendela Verb-Ber ;
kata Verb-Ber ;
laku Verb-Ber ;
lalu Verb-Ber ;
lari Verb-Ber ;
main Verb-Ber ;
sama Verb-Ber ;
sembunyi Verb-Ber ;
tanya Verb-Ber ;
temu Verb-Ber ;
ujar Verb-Ber ;
umur Verb-Ber ;
usia Verb-Ber ;

gesa Verb-Ter ;
tawa Verb-Ter ;
tidur Verb-Ter ;


LEXICON Adjectives

bahagia Adj ;
baik Adj ;
besar Adj ;
cerah Adj ;
cermat Adj ;
cukup Adj ;
dekat Adj ;
dingin Adj ;
hangat Adj ;
indah Adj ;
jelas Adj ;
kecil Adj ;
lain Adj ;
lebih Adj ;
mungil Adj ;
pasti Adj ;
perlahan Adj ;
putih Adj ;
sama Adj ;
sejuk Adj ;
senang Adj ;
seronok Adj ;
tentu Adj ;
tidur Adj ;
tua Adj ;


LEXICON ProperNouns

Maria Np ;
Yakub Np ;


LEXICON Adverbs

akhirnya Adv ;
amatlah Adv ;
bukan Adv ;
ingin Adv ;
jangan Adv ;
juga Adv ;
lagi Adv ;
masih Adv ;
mungkin Adv ;
pernah Adv ;
sahaja Adv ;
saja Adv ;
sangat Adv ;
sedang Adv ;
selalu Adv ;
sudah Adv ;
tak Adv ;
telah Adv ;
tentunya Adv ;
tidak Adv ;


LEXICON Conjunctions

atau Cnjcoo ;
dan Cnjcoo ;
namun Cnjcoo ;
tapi Cnjcoo ;
tetapi Cnjcoo ;

bahawa Cnjsub ;
jika Cnjsub ;
kalau Cnjsub ;
kerana Cnjsub ;
kemudian Cnjsub ;
ketika Cnjsub ;
maka Cnjsub ;
makanya Cnjsub ;
meski Cnjsub ;
meskipun Cnjsub ;
oleh% itu Cnjsub ;
saat Cnjsub ;


LEXICON Questions

apa Qst ;
apakah Qst ;
di% mana Qst ;
di% manakah Qst ;
ke% mana Qst ;
ke% manakah Qst ;
mana Qst ;
mengapa Qst ;

tahukah Qst ;
mungkinkah Qst ;


LEXICON Prepositions
dari Pr ;
daripada Pr ;
dengan Pr ;
di Pr ;
ke Pr ;
kepada Pr ;
pada Pr ;
untuk Pr ;

LEXICON Pronouns

ini Prn ;
itu Prn ;
mana%-mana Prn ;
sana Prn ;
sesuatu Prn ;

aku Prn-Sg-P1 ;

anda Prn-Sg-P2 ;
kamu Prn-Sg-P2 ;
kau Prn-Sg-P2 ;

dia Prn-Sg-P3 ;
ia Prn-Sg-P3 ;

mereka Prn-Pl-P3 ;


LEXICON Numerals

dua Num-Card ;
lima Num-Card ;
enam Num-Card ;
dua Num-Ord ;
lima Num-Ord ;
enam Num-Ord ;


LEXICON Particles

nah Part ;
si Part ;
yang Part ;


!****************** Tagger ******************

LEXICON Noun-Sg

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" .x. 0 ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;

LEXICON Noun-Sg-Nya

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" "<nya>" .x. n y a ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;

LEXICON Noun-Sg-An

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" "<an>" .x. a n ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;

LEXICON Noun-Sg-Ke-An

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" "<ke>" "<an>" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.ke@" > # ;

LEXICON Noun-Sg-Per-An

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" "<per>" "<an>" .x. a n ] "@R.PREF.per@" > # ;

LEXICON Noun-Sg-Per-An-Nya

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" "<per>" "<an>" "<nya>" .x. a n n y a ] "@R.PREF.per@" >  # ;

LEXICON Noun-Sg-Se

< [ "<n>" "<sg>" "<se>" .x. 0 ] "@R.PREF.se@" > # ;



LEXICON Verb

< [ "<vblex>" .x. 0 ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;

LEXICON Verb-MeN

< [ "<vblex>" "<men>" .x. 0 ] "@R.PREF.meN@" > # ;

LEXICON Verb-MeN-I

< [ "<vblex>" "<men>" "<i>" .x. i ] "@R.PREF.meN@" > # ;

LEXICON Verb-MeN-Kan

< [ "<vblex>" "<men>" "<kan>" .x. k a n ] "@R.PREF.meN@" > # ;

LEXICON Verb-Di-Kan

< [ "<vblex>" "<di>" "<kan>" .x. k a n ] "@R.PREF.di@" > # ;

LEXICON Verb-Ber

< [ "<vblex>" "<ber>" .x. 0 ] "@R.PREF.ber@" > # ;

LEXICON Verb-Ter

< [ "<vblex>" "<ter>" .x. 0 ] "@R.PREF.ter@" > # ;



LEXICON Adj

< [ "<adj>" .x. 0 ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;


LEXICON Adv

< [ "<adv>" .x. 0 ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;


LEXICON Np

%<np%>: # ;


LEXICON Cnjcoo

%<cnjcoo%>: # ;


LEXICON Cnjsub

%<cnjsub%>: # ;


LEXICON Qst

%<qst%>: # ;


LEXICON Pr

%<pr%>: # ;


LEXICON Prn

%<prn%>: # ;

LEXICON Prn-Sg-P1

%<prn%>%<sg%>%<p1%>: # ;

LEXICON Prn-Sg-P2

%<prn%>%<sg%>%<p2%>: # ;

LEXICON Prn-Sg-P3

%<prn%>%<sg%>%<p3%>: # ;

LEXICON Prn-Pl-P1

%<prn%>%<pl%>%<p1%>: # ;

LEXICON Prn-Pl-P2

%<prn%>%<pl%>%<p2%>: # ;

LEXICON Prn-Pl-P3

%<prn%>%<pl%>%<p3%>: # ;


LEXICON Num-Card

< [ "<num>" "<card>" .x. 0 ] "@D.PREF@" > # ;

LEXICON Num-Ord

< [ "<num>" "<ord>" .x. 0 ] "@R.PREF.ke@" > # ;


LEXICON Part

%<part%>: # ;
